Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-1064
State Department of Education Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The State Department of Education Cash Fund is created. Except as to other revenue the disposition of which is otherwise provided for, all sums of money received by the State Department of Education from the sale of goods and materiel, fees from any training program or services rendered, and any revenue such department may receive from any other source shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Department of Education Cash Fund. The State Treasurer shall disburse such amounts in the fund as are available and considered incident to the administration and operation of the State Department of Education. Money in the State Department of Education Cash Fund may be transferred to the General Fund or the Education Future Fund at the direction of the Legislature. All disbursements for the State Department of Education Cash Fund shall be made upon vouchers issued by the State Department of Education and warrants drawn by the Director of Administrative Services. Any money in the State Department of Education Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1973, LB 544, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 469, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1346;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 710;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 165.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.